Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB712.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 64.185 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Coroners shall receive out of the county, consolidated local government,
charter county government, urban-county government, or unified local
government treasury, whichever is appropriate, the annual[monthly]
compensation the fiscal court of each county shall fix, subject to this
subsection.[the following minimums:]
(b) 1. a. The salary schedule for coroners in subdivision b. of this
subparagraph provides for nine (9) levels of minimum salaries
based upon the population of the county in the year prior to the
election of the coroner. To implement the salary schedule, the
Department for Local Government shall, by November 1 of each
year preceding the election of the coroner, certify for each
county the population group applicable to each county based on
the most recent estimates of the United States Department of
Commerce, Bureau of the Census. The salary schedule shall
remain as determined by the Department for Local Government,
regardless of changes in the population estimates or the actual
census count that may occur during the term for which the
coroner has been elected or appointed.
b. i. The salary schedule provides four (4) steps for yearly
increments within each population group. A coroner's
salary shall be at a minimum equal to the amount stated for
the first step within the applicable population group for the
first year or portion thereof the coroner serves in office.
Thereafter, on January 1 of each subsequent year, the
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 279
coroner's salary shall be advanced automatically to the
next step in the salary schedule for the population group
and shall be at a minimum equal to the salary amount
stated for that step.
ii. Prior to assuming office, any person assuming the office as
a coroner must certify to the commissioner of the
Department for Local Government the total number of
years, not to exceed four (4) years, that the person has
previously served as a coroner. The Department for Local
Government shall place the coroner in the proper step
based upon a formula of one (1) incremental step per full
calendar year of service:
SALARY SCHEDULE
County Population Steps and Minimum Salary for Coroners
by Group
Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4
Group I
0-4,999 $20,240.84 $21,013.00 $21,785.16 $22,557.32
Group II
5,000-9,999 23,557.32 24,329.48 25,101.64 25,873.80
Group III
10,000-19,999 26,873.80 27,916.22 28,958.64 32,001.06
Group IV
20,000-29,999 32,001.06 33,043.48 34,085.90 35,128.32
Group V
30,000-44,999 37,128.32 38,535.58 39,942.84 41,350.10
Group VI
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 279
45,000-59,999 44,350.10 45,757.36 47,164.62 48,571.88
Group VII
60,000-89,999 51,571.88 53,471.68 55,371.48 57,271.28
Group VIII
90,000-499,999 63,271.28 65,836.01 68,400.74 70,965.47
Group IX
500,000 and up 76,965.47 79,530.20 82,094.93 84,659.66
2. The salary schedule in subparagraph 1.b. of this paragraph is for the
compensation of full-time work. The fiscal court shall adjust the
salary of a part-time coroner by applying a percentage computed from
the hours of service provided by the part-time coroner.
(c) By the second Friday in February of every year, the Department for Local
Government shall adjust the salary schedule in paragraph (b) of this
subsection accordingly by using the percent increase in the nonseasonally
adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
(CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, between the two (2) most recent
calendar years available, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor
Statistics. Once adjusted, the Department for Local Government shall notify
each fiscal court of the adjusted salary schedule. The adjusted salary
amounts shall be retroactive to the preceding January 1, and shall not
exceed the amount determined by the annual adjustment required under
KRS 64.527.
(d) No coroner holding office on the effective date of this Act shall receive a
reduction in pay as a result of this subsection.
(e) 1. In addition to the step increases based on service in office, each
coroner shall be paid an annual incentive of one hundred dollars
($100) per calendar year for the completion of the training courses in
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 279
subsection (4) of this section.
2. The coroner shall report all completed training courses to the
Department for Local Government.
3. If a coroner fails, without good cause as determined by the
commissioner of the Department for Local Government, to obtain the
minimum amount of approved training in any year, the coroner shall
lose all training incentives previously accumulated.
4. The training incentive in subparagraph (e) 1. of this paragraph shall
be adjusted by the Department for Local Government on an annual
basis for any increase or decrease in the consumer price index in the
same manner as salaries are adjusted in paragraph (c) of this
subsection.
5. The Department for Local Government may promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
establish guidelines for the training incentive and the reporting of
training courses.
[ County Monthly Minimum
Population Compensation
1. 10,000 or less $200
2. 10,001 to 20,000 300
3. 20,001 to 40,000 350
4. 40,001 to 60,000 400
5. 60,001 to 100,000 450
6. 100,001 to 150,000 800
7. 150,001 or more 1,000
(b) Coroners who hold a current certificate of continuing education, issued
jointly by the Department of Criminal Justice Training, Justice and
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 279
Public Safety Cabinet, and the Office of the Kentucky State Medical
Examiner, Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and who have completed
the course described in subsection (4)(b) of this section, shall be paid the
following minimum monthly compensation set forth in this subsection
in recognition of the training:
County Monthly Minimum
Population Compensation
1. 10,000 or less $400
2. 10,001 to 20,000 500
3. 20,001 to 40,000 650
4. 40,001 to 60,000 750
5. 60,001 to 100,000 850
6. 100,001 to 150,000 1,100
7. 150,001 or more 1,300]
(2) (a) Deputy coroners who hold a current certificate of continuing education[, as
described in subsection (1)(b) of this section,] and have completed the course
described in subsection (4)(b) of this section, shall receive out of the county,
consolidated local government, charter county government, urban-county
government, or unified local government treasury, whichever is appropriate,
the monthly compensation the fiscal court of each county shall fix, subject to
the following minimums:
County Monthly Minimum
Population Compensation
1.[(a)] 4,999[10,000] or less $400[$200]
2.[(b)] 5,000[10,001] to 9,999[20,000] 500[250]
3.[(c)] 10,000[20,001] to 19,999[40,000] 550[275]
4.[(d)] 20,000[40,001] to 29,999[60,000] 600[300]
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 279
5.[(e)] 30,000[60,001] to 44,999[100,000] 800[400]
6.[(f)] 45,000[100,001] to 59,999[150,000] 1,800[900]
7.[(g)] 60,000 to 89,999[150,001 or more] 2,200[1,100]
8. 90,000 to 499,999 2,600
9. 500,000 and more 2,800
(b)[(3)] 1. In order to equate the compensation of deputy coroners with the
purchasing power of the dollar, every year:
a. The Department for Local Government shall adjust the monthly
minimum compensations provided in this subsection by a cost-
of-living adjustment; and
b. A cost-of-living adjustment shall be granted to each deputy
coroner's annual salary.
2. The cost-of-living adjustments provided in this subsection shall be
computed by using the percent increase in the nonseasonally adjusted
annual average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
(CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, between the two (2) most recent
calendar years available, as published by the United States Bureau of
Labor Statistics and shall not be less than zero (0).
3. The monthly minimum compensation amounts under paragraph (a) of
this subsection are for compensation of full-time work. The fiscal
court shall adjust the salary of a part-time deputy coroner by applying
a percentage computed from the hours of service provided by the part-
time deputy coroner.
(3) The fiscal court of any county, or the legislative body of a consolidated local
government, charter county government, urban-county government, or unified local
government shall:
(a) Provide[may compensate] coroners and deputy coroners an additional amount
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 279
of up to three hundred dollars ($300) per month for operational expenses;
(b) Pay for the cost of all post mortem bags and mortuary equipment used by
the coroner or deputy coroner solely in the performance of the job. The
fiscal court may pay for the cost of these items upfront or choose to
reimburse coroners or deputy coroners for their incurred costs on a monthly
basis; and
(c) Reimburse coroners and deputy coroners for the cost of the training courses
required under subsection (4) of this section[as an expense allowance].
(4) (a) The initial course of continuing education[ required under subsection (1)(b) of
this section] shall consist of a forty (40) hour basic training course prescribed
by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet. Annually thereafter the coroner shall
attend and successfully complete at least eighteen (18) hours of approved
training in order to be compensated in accordance with subsection
(1)(e)[(1)(b)] of this section.
(b) Within three (3) years of initially assuming office, in order to be compensated
in accordance with subsections (1)(e)[(b)] and (2) of this section, a coroner or
deputy coroner shall attend and complete a course of at least four (4) hours
provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Training that shall include
instruction on the grieving process and best practices for providing a notice of
death to a spouse or next of kin and may include instruction on other similar
topics. A coroner or deputy coroner that has completed the course shall not be
required to retake the course.
(c)[(5)] If a deputy coroner assumes the office of coroner after receiving the
training stipulated in this subsection[section], the deputy coroner shall be
compensated in accordance with[ the compensation schedule set forth in]
subsection (1)(e)[(b)] of this section.
(5)[(6)] The number of deputy coroners in a county shall not exceed one (1) for each
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 279
twenty-five thousand (25,000) inhabitants, or fraction thereof, according to the most
recent federal census, but every coroner may, subject to the approval of the
legislative body of the county, consolidated local government, charter county
government, urban-county government, or unified local government, appoint
additional deputy coroners, regardless of population.
Section 2. This Act takes effect January 4, 2027.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 2:10 PM Jacketed